bulgarian.affix
# The Ispell Bulgarian dictionary is part of bgOffice project
# http://bgoffice.sourceforge.net/
#
#
# =========
# COPYRIGHT
# =========
#
#   ispell-bg part of bgOffice
#   Copyright (C) 2001-2010 Radostin Radnev <radnev@gmail.com>
#
#   This program comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY. This is free
# software, and you are welcome to redistribute it under certain
# conditions. This package is distributed under the terms of either
# GNU General Public License Version 2 or later,
# or GNU Lesser General Public License Version 3 or later,
# or the Mozilla Public License Version 1.1.
# For details read file GPL-2.0.txt, LGPL-3.0.txt and MPL-1.1.txt.
#
# ====
# Note
# ====
#
# Some of the headers from the original file have been removed. You can
# download the original file from http://bgoffice.sourceforge.net/ispell/index.html.

nroffchars	().\\*
texchars	()\[]{}<\>\\$*.%

wordchars	[а-я] [А-Я]

suffixes

flag *A:
    .        >      А
    .        >      АТА
    .        >      И
    .        >      ИТЕ
    .        >      ИЯ
    .        >      ИЯТ
    .        >      О
    .        >      ОТО

flag *B:
    .        >      И
    .        >      ИТЕ
    .        >      ТА

flag *C:
    .        >      А
    .        >      И
    .        >      ИТЕ
    .        >      ЪТ

flag *D:
    .        >      А
    .        >      ОВЕ
    .        >      ОВЕТЕ
    .        >      ЪТ

flag *E:
    .        >      И
    .        >      ИТЕ
    .        >      Ю
    .        >      Я
    .        >      ЯТ

flag *F:
    .        >      А
    .        >      Е
    .        >      И
    .        >      ИТЕ
    .        >      ЪТ

flag *G:
    .        >      А
    .        >      И
    .        >      ИТЕ
    .        >      О
    .        >      ЪТ

flag *H:
    .        >      И
    .        >      ИТЕ
    .        >      Я
    .        >      ЯТ

flag *I:
    .        >      А
    .        >      ЪТ

flag *J:
    .        >      ТА
    .        >      ТАТА
    .        >      ТО

flag *K:
    А        >      -А,АТА
    А        >      -А,И
    А        >      -А,ИТЕ
    Г        >      -Г,ГА
    Г        >      -Г,ГЪТ
    Г        >      -Г,ЗИ
    Г        >      -Г,ЗИТЕ
    Е Н      >      -ЕН,НА
    Е Н      >      -ЕН,НАТА
    Е Н      >      -ЕН,НИ
    Е Н      >      -ЕН,НИТЕ
    Е Н      >      -ЕН,НИЯ
    Е Н      >      -ЕН,НИЯТ
    Е Н      >      -ЕН,НО
    Е Н      >      -ЕН,НОТО
    И        >      -И,А
    И        >      -И,АТА
    И        >      -И,ИТЕ
    И        >      -И,ИЯ
    И        >      -И,ИЯТ
    И        >      -И,О
    И        >      -И,ОТО
    Я        >      -Я,И
    Я        >      -Я,ИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯТА

flag *L:
    А        >      -А,АТА
    А        >      -А,И
    А        >      -А,ИТЕ
    Е        >      -Е,ЕТО
    Е Н      >      -ЕН,ЙНА
    Е Н      >      -ЕН,ЙНАТА
    Е Н      >      -ЕН,ЙНИ
    Е Н      >      -ЕН,ЙНИТЕ
    Е Н      >      -ЕН,ЙНИЯ
    Е Н      >      -ЕН,ЙНИЯТ
    Е Н      >      -ЕН,ЙНО
    Е Н      >      -ЕН,ЙНОТО
    Е Ц      >      -ЕЦ,ЕЦА
    Е Ц      >      -ЕЦ,ЕЦО
    Е Ц      >      -ЕЦ,ЕЦЪТ
    Е Ц      >      -ЕЦ,ЦИ
    Е Ц      >      -ЕЦ,ЦИТЕ
    Е        >      -Е,Я
    Е        >      -Е,ЯТА
    И        >      -И,А
    И        >      -И,АТА
    И        >      -И,ИТЕ
    И        >      -И,ИЯ
    И        >      -И,ИЯТ
    И        >      -И,О
    И        >      -И,ОТО
    О        >      -О,А
    О        >      -О,АТА
    О        >      -О,ОТО
    Ъ В      >      -ЪВ,ВА
    Ъ В      >      -ЪВ,ВАТА
    Ъ В      >      -ЪВ,ВИ
    Ъ В      >      -ЪВ,ВИТЕ
    Ъ В      >      -ЪВ,ВИЯ
    Ъ В      >      -ЪВ,ВИЯТ
    Ъ В      >      -ЪВ,ВО
    Ъ В      >      -ЪВ,ВОТО
    Ъ Г      >      -ЪГ,ГА
    Ъ Г      >      -ЪГ,ГАТА
    Ъ Г      >      -ЪГ,ГИ
    Ъ Г      >      -ЪГ,ГИТЕ
    Ъ Г      >      -ЪГ,ГИЯ
    Ъ Г      >      -ЪГ,ГИЯТ
    Ъ Г      >      -ЪГ,ГО
    Ъ Г      >      -ЪГ,ГОТО
    Ъ К      >      -ЪК,КА
    Ъ К      >      -ЪК,КАТА
    Ъ К      >      -ЪК,КИ
    Ъ К      >      -ЪК,КИТЕ
    Ъ К      >      -ЪК,КИЯ
    Ъ К      >      -ЪК,КИЯТ
    Ъ К      >      -ЪК,КО
    Ъ К      >      -ЪК,КОТО
    Ъ Л      >      -ЪЛ,ЛА
    Ъ Л      >      -ЪЛ,ЛАТА
    Ъ Л      >      -ЪЛ,ЛИ
    Ъ Л      >      -ЪЛ,ЛИТЕ
    Ъ Л      >      -ЪЛ,ЛИЯ
    Ъ Л      >      -ЪЛ,ЛИЯТ
    Ъ Л      >      -ЪЛ,ЛО
    Ъ Л      >      -ЪЛ,ЛОТО
    Ъ Р      >      -ЪР,РА
    Ъ Р      >      -ЪР,РАТА
    Ъ Р      >      -ЪР,РИ
    Ъ Р      >      -ЪР,РИТЕ
    Ъ Р      >      -ЪР,РИЯ
    Ъ Р      >      -ЪР,РИЯТ
    Ъ Р      >      -ЪР,РО
    Ъ Р      >      -ЪР,РОТО
    Ъ Ш      >      -ЪШ,ША
    Ъ Ш      >      -ЪШ,ШАТА
    Ъ Ш      >      -ЪШ,ШИ
    Ъ Ш      >      -ЪШ,ШИТЕ
    Ъ Ш      >      -ЪШ,ШИЯ
    Ъ Ш      >      -ЪШ,ШИЯТ
    Ъ Ш      >      -ЪШ,ШО
    Ъ Ш      >      -ЪШ,ШОТО
    Я В      >      -ЯВ,ЕВИ
    Я В      >      -ЯВ,ЕВИТЕ
    Я В      >      -ЯВ,ЕВИЯ
    Я В      >      -ЯВ,ЕВИЯТ
    Я В      >      -ЯВ,ЯВА
    Я В      >      -ЯВ,ЯВАТА
    Я В      >      -ЯВ,ЯВО
    Я В      >      -ЯВ,ЯВОТО
    Я К      >      -ЯК,ЕКИ
    Я К      >      -ЯК,ЕКИТЕ
    Я К      >      -ЯК,ЕКИЯ
    Я К      >      -ЯК,ЕКИЯТ
    Я К      >      -ЯК,ЯКА
    Я К      >      -ЯК,ЯКАТА
    Я К      >      -ЯК,ЯКО
    Я К      >      -ЯК,ЯКОТО
    Я Л      >      -ЯЛ,ЕЛИ
    Я Л      >      -ЯЛ,ЕЛИТЕ
    Я Л      >      -ЯЛ,ЕЛИЯ
    Я Л      >      -ЯЛ,ЕЛИЯТ
    Я Л      >      -ЯЛ,ЯЛА
    Я Л      >      -ЯЛ,ЯЛАТА
    Я Л      >      -ЯЛ,ЯЛО
    Я Л      >      -ЯЛ,ЯЛОТО
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЕМИ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЕМИТЕ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЕМИЯ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЕМИЯТ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯМА
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯМАТА
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯМО
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯМОТО
    Я Н      >      -ЯН,ЕНИ
    Я Н      >      -ЯН,ЕНИТЕ
    Я Н      >      -ЯН,ЕНИЯ
    Я Н      >      -ЯН,ЕНИЯТ
    Я Н      >      -ЯН,ЯНА
    Я Н      >      -ЯН,ЯНАТА
    Я Н      >      -ЯН,ЯНО
    Я Н      >      -ЯН,ЯНОТО
    Я П      >      -ЯП,ЕПИ
    Я П      >      -ЯП,ЕПИТЕ
    Я П      >      -ЯП,ЕПИЯ
    Я П      >      -ЯП,ЕПИЯТ
    Я П      >      -ЯП,ЯПА
    Я П      >      -ЯП,ЯПАТА
    Я П      >      -ЯП,ЯПО
    Я П      >      -ЯП,ЯПОТО
    Я Т      >      -ЯТ,ЕТИ
    Я Т      >      -ЯТ,ЕТИТЕ
    Я Т      >      -ЯТ,ЕТИЯ
    Я Т      >      -ЯТ,ЕТИЯТ
    Я Т      >      -ЯТ,ЯТА
    Я Т      >      -ЯТ,ЯТАТА
    Я Т      >      -ЯТ,ЯТО
    Я Т      >      -ЯТ,ЯТОТО

flag *M:
    Е        >      -Е,А
    Е        >      -Е,АТА
    Е        >      -Е,ЕТО
    Е Ц      >      -ЕЦ,ЕЦА
    Е Ц      >      -ЕЦ,ЕЦО
    Е Ц      >      -ЕЦ,ЕЦЪТ
    Е Ц      >      -ЕЦ,ЙЦИ
    Е Ц      >      -ЕЦ,ЙЦИТЕ
    И Н      >      -ИН,И
    И Н      >      -ИН,ИНА
    И Н      >      -ИН,ИНО
    И Н      >      -ИН,ИНЪТ
    И Н      >      -ИН,ИТЕ
    Й        >      -Й,И
    Й        >      -Й,ИТЕ
    Й        >      -Й,Ю
    Й        >      -Й,Я
    Й        >      -Й,ЯТ
    О        >      -О,И
    О        >      -О,ИТЕ
    О        >      -О,ОТО
    Ъ М      >      -ЪМ,МА
    Ъ М      >      -ЪМ,МИ
    Ъ М      >      -ЪМ,МИТЕ
    Ъ М      >      -ЪМ,МЪТ
    Ъ М      >      -ЪМ,ЪМА
    Я        >      -Я,И
    Я        >      -Я,ИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯТА

flag *N:
    Е Л      >      -ЕЛ,ЕЛА
    Е Л      >      -ЕЛ,ЕЛЪТ
    Е Л      >      -ЕЛ,ЛИ
    Е Л      >      -ЕЛ,ЛИТЕ
    Е Ц      >      -ЕЦ,ЕЦА
    Е Ц      >      -ЕЦ,ЕЦЪТ
    Е Ц      >      -ЕЦ,ЦИ
    Е Ц      >      -ЕЦ,ЦИТЕ
    Ъ Л      >      -ЪЛ,ЛИ
    Ъ Л      >      -ЪЛ,ЛИТЕ
    Ъ Л      >      -ЪЛ,ЪЛА
    Ъ Л      >      -ЪЛ,ЪЛЪТ
    Ъ М      >      -ЪМ,МИ
    Ъ М      >      -ЪМ,МИТЕ
    Ъ М      >      -ЪМ,ЪМА
    Ъ М      >      -ЪМ,ЪМЪТ
    Ъ Р      >      -ЪР,РИ
    Ъ Р      >      -ЪР,РИТЕ
    Ъ Р      >      -ЪР,ЪРА
    Ъ Р      >      -ЪР,ЪРЪТ
